District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-308.29

Appropriations contingency.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-203, § 10, 53 DCR 9055
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 7078, 55 DCR 7598

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10 of District of Columbia Poverty Lawyer Loan Repayment Program Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-512, October 25, 2006, 53 DCR 9086).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10 of District of Columbia Poverty Lawyer Loan Repayment Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-563, December 19, 2006, 53 DCR 10259).